New York, session 2025-2026, A6216.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The title heading of title 6 of article 9 of the public 2 authorities law, as added by chapter 307 of the laws of 1964 and such 3 title as renumbered by chapter 838 of the laws of 1983, is amended and a 4 new section 2901 is added to read as follows: 5 EMINENT DOMAIN TAKING; PROPERTY OF OR BY A PUBLIC 6 BENEFIT CORPORATION 7 § 2901. Eminent domain; certain cities. In cities with a population of 8 one million or more in which any part of the real property to be 9 acquired is located, the city council shall have the authority to 10 approve or disapprove any public authority's or public benefit corpo- 11 ration's use of eminent domain. The city council shall approve or disap- 12 prove any proposed use of the power of eminent domain by majority vote. 13 Prior to such vote, such city council shall hold at least one official 14 public hearing on such matter at a location reasonably proximate to the 15 property which may be acquired. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 17 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04993-01-5